Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-524.03
Aquatic invasive species; rules
and regulations.

The
commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out section
37-524.02.

Laws 2012, LB391, § 7.